Idaho, session 2025, S1220.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources
the following amounts from the listed funds for personnel costs for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery Fund $37,000
Miscellaneous Revenue Fund 11,300
TOTAL $48,300
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources is
hereby reduced by the following amounts from the listed funds for personnel
costs for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Renewable Energy Resources Fund $30,400
Petroleum Price Violation Fund 17,900
TOTAL $48,300
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.